incubator/apertium-es-an.an.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>AaÁáBbCcDdEeÉéFfGgHhIiÍíJjKkLlMmNnÑñOoÓóPpQqRrSsTtUuÚúÜüVvWwXxYyZz</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="enc"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="infps"/>
    <sdef n="ger" c="Cherundio"/>
    <sdef n="gerps"/>
    <sdef n="pp" c="Partizipio"/>
    <sdef n="pri" c="Present d'endicatibo"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="pii" c="Imperfeuto d'endicatibo"/>
    <sdef n="pmp"/>
    <sdef n="ifi" c="Pasato d'endicatibo"/>
    <sdef n="fti" c="Futuro"/>
    <sdef n="cni" c="Condizional"/>
    <sdef n="prs" c="Presén de Subchuntibo"/>
    <sdef n="pis" c="Imperfeuto de Subchuntibo"/>
    <sdef n="fts"/>
    <sdef n="imp" c="Imperatibo"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?(%)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <re>,</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separ">
      <e>
        <re>¿</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="/él__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>él</l> 
          <r>él<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ellos</l> 
          <r>él<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ella</l> 
          <r>él<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ellas</l> 
          <r>él<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nusatr/os__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l> 
          <r>os<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l> 
          <r>os<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="busatr/os__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l> 
          <r>os<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l> 
          <r>os<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="yo__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l> 
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tú__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l> 
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <e lm="yo"><i>yo</i><par n="yo__prn"/></e>
  <e lm="tú"><i>tú</i><par n="tú__prn"/></e>
  <e lm="él"><i></i><par n="/él__prn"/></e>
  <e lm="nusatros"><i>nusatr</i><par n="nusatr/os__prn"/></e>
  <e lm="busatros"><i>busatr</i><par n="busatr/os__prn"/></e>
